Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 37 Regulation of Powdered Caffeine

21-37-1.
Legislative findings and purpose.

Caffeine is a known alkaloid found in cocoa, coffee, tea, kola nuts, and is naturally present in more than sixty (60) plants. While generally used as a stimulant, it does not actually provide energy, but on the contrary, provides the illusion of energy. While caffeine can be found naturally, powdered caffeine is manufactured in a laboratory setting, and if used in small doses, can be used safely to caffeinate medicines, food, and soft drinks. When used in high doses however, caffeine can raise the user’s blood pressure, cause heartburn, dehydration, and can lead to seizures, erratic heartbeats, and in some cases, death.

Currently, powdered caffeine is not regulated by the Food and Drug Administration, and it is the purpose of this chapter to promote the health and safety of the consumers, particularly minors, by regulating the sale, possession, and use of powdered caffeine within the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 133, § 1.

21-37-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Caffeine” means that central nervous-system stimulant and known alkaloid commonly found in cocoa and coffee seeds or beans; and

“Powdered caffeine” means any concentrated powdered form of the stimulant caffeine, or any powder substance sold or marketed as pure or concentrated caffeine.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 133, § 1.

21-37-3.
Prohibited activities.

It shall be illegal for any person, partnership, corporation, or other entity to sell, give, provide, or otherwise supply powdered caffeine to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years.

Any person, partnership, corporation, or other entity located within or without the state of Rhode Island that violates §

21-37-3(a)

, shall be punished upon conviction:

For a first offense, by a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500);

For a second offense, by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) and/or imprisonment of up to one year; and

For a third or subsequent offense, by a fine of up to three thousand dollars ($3,000) and/or imprisonment of up to three (3) years.

Any person being under the age of twenty-one (21) years who possesses powdered caffeine may be punished upon conviction by a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500) and may be ordered to perform up to thirty (30) hours of community service, and upon a second or subsequent violation hereof, may additionally be ordered to undergo a substance abuse assessment by a licensed, substance abuse professional.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 133, § 1.